dictsource/ar_rules
// *   Arabic Language ar ar_rules
// *   This file writen by Taha Zerrouki 2012
// ***************************************************************************
// *   This program is free software; you can redistribute it and/or modify  *
// *   it under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by  *
// *   the Free Software Foundation; either version 3 of the License, or     *
// *   (at your option) any later version.                                   *
// *                                                                         *
// *   This program is distributed in the hope that it will be useful,       *
// *   but WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of        *
// *   MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.  See the         *
// *   GNU General Public License for more details.                          *
// *                                                                         *
// *   You should have received a copy of the GNU General Public License     *
// *   along with this program; if not, see:                                 *
// *               <http://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.                           *
// ***************************************************************************/
//
// This file is UTF-8 encoded
// all words must be LOWER CASE  (although the initial letter will be automatically
// converted if it's a 7bit ascii character)
// Text to phoneme rules for Arabic
//
// replace Arabic  eastern  character numbers with Arabic western character numbers
.replace
     ٠       0
     ۰       0
     ۱       1
     ١       1
     ٢       2
     ۲       2
     ٣       3
     ۳       3
     ٤       4
     ۴       4
     ٥       5
     ۵       5
     ٦       6
     ۶       6
     ٧       7
     ۷       7
     ٨       8
     ۸       8
     ٩       9
     ۹       9
     ،       ,
     ؛       ;

// Multicharacters into single characters

      ٰٔ       أ   // Superscript alef with Hamza above > Alef with hamza above

// Reorder diacritics in "canonical order"

      َّ        َّ   // Fatha Shadda > Shadda Fatha
      ِّ        ِّ   // Kasra Shadda > Shadda Kasra
      ّْ        ّْ   // Sukun Shadda > Shadda Sukun

// Specific glyphs into standard symbols
      ٔ       ء   // Hamza above > Hamza
      ٕ       ء   // Hamza below > Hamza

// Named letter groups:
// list of short vowels
// A:  َ  ُ  ِ
// list of consonants
// C: ب پ ت ة ث ج ح خ د ذ ر ز س ش ص ض ط ظ ع غ ف ق ك ل م ن ئ ؤ ء أ آ إ ه
// Consonant/vowel letters
// B: ا و ي
// "Thick" letters
// F: ص ض ط ظ
// Shadda
// G:  ّ
// Hamza
// H: ء
// Sukun
// Y:  ْ

// all vowels/diphthongs in vocalized text
// (fatha, damma, kasra, fatha+alef, fatha+alef_maksura, damma+waw, kasra+yeh, yeh+fatha, waw+fatha, superscript alef)
.L01  َ  ُ  ِ  َا  َى  ُو  ِي يَ وَ  ٰ

// Long vowels and diphthongs in vocalized text
// (fatha+alef, fatha+alef_maksura, damma+waw, kasra+yeh, yeh+fatha, waw+fatha, superscript alef)
.L03  َا  َى  ُو  ِي يَ وَ  ٰ

// Implicit long vowels in UNvocalized text (alef, alef maksura, waw, yeh)
.L04 ا ى و ي

// all Arabic characters without short vowels and A
.L05  ض ص ث ق ف غ ع ه خ ح ج  ش س ي ب ل ت ن م ك  ظ ط ز ر ذ د ئ و ة ي  ؤ إ أ ء  پ گ

// group of digits
.L06 0 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9

// all Arabic characters
.L09  ض ص ث ق ف غ ع ه خ ح ج  ً ٌ ٍ ، ؛ ش س ي ب ل ا ت ن م ك  َ ُ ِ ّ  آ ـ « » ظ ط ز ر ذ د ئ و ة ي ژ ؤ إ أ ء ؟ پ گ

// Arabic Sun characters
.L10  ض ص ث ش س ل ت ن ظ ط ز ر ذ د

// Arabic Moon characters
.L11  ق ف غ ع ه خ ح ج ي ب م ك  و  إ أ ء

// Arabic diacritics
.L20  ۡ ـ  ً  ٌ  ٍ  َ  ُ  ِ  ّ  ْ

// Non-thick consonants
.L30 ب پ ت ة ث ج ح خ د ذ ر ز س ش ع غ ف ك ل م ن ئ ؤ ء أ آ إ ه

.group آ
         آ           ?a:

.group ا
         ا           a:
    L30) ا           a:
      F) ا           a.:
     FG) ا           a.:
    L30) ا (C        a:
      F) ا (C        a.:
     FG) ا (C        a.:
         ا (َ         ?
         ا (ُ         ?
         ا (ِ         ?
      _) ال (P2      %al
      _) ا           a       // make the previous fatha long
         اء          ?       // Carried Hamza
      _) ال (L10P2   ?a      //الشمس
      _) ال (L11P2   ?al     //القمر
      _) ال (تP2     ?at
      _) ال (ثP2     ?aT
      _) ال (دP2     ?ad
      _) ال (ذP2     ?aD
      _) ال (رP2     ?ar
      _) ال (زP2     ?az
      _) ال (سP2     ?as
      _) ال (شّP2     ?a
      _) ال (شP2     ?aS
      _) ال (صP2     ?as[
      _) ال (ضP2     ?adH
      _) ال (ظP2     ?aZ
      _) ال (لP2     ?al
      _) ال (نP2     ?an
     _ب) ا (ل        i

.group أ
         أ           ?        // Carried Hamza

.group إ
         إ           ?        // Carried Hamza

.group ب
         ب           b
         ب (_        b
         بّ           b:
         بّْ           b:
         بْ           b
      _) ب           b%
      _) بال (L10P3  bi        //بالشمس
      _) بال (L11P3  bil       //بالقمر
      _) بال (تP3    bit
      _) بال (ثP3    biT
      _) بال (دP3    bid
      _) بال (ذP3    biD
      _) بال (رP3    bir
      _) بال (زP3    biz
      _) بال (سP3    bis
      _) بال (شP3    biS
      _) بال (صP3    bis[
      _) بال (ضP3    bidH
      _) بال (طP3    bit[
      _) بال (ظP3    biZ
      _) بال (لP3    bil
      _) بال (نP3    bin

.group پ
         پ           p
         پ (_        p
         پّْ           p:
         پْ           p

.group ت
         ت           t
      _) ت (َP1       t
         ت (_        t
         تّ           t:
         تّْ           t:
         تْ           t

.group ث
         ث           T
         ث (_        T
         ثّ           T:
         ثّْ           T:
         ثْ           T

.group ج
         ج           dZ
         ج (_        dZ
         جّ           dZ:
         جّْ           dZ:
         جْ           dZ

.group ح
         ح           H
         ح (_        H
         حّ           H:
         حّْ           H:
         حْ           H

.group خ
         خ           X
         خ (_        X
         خّ           X:
         خّْ           X:
         خْ           X

.group د
         د           d
         د (_        d
         دّ           d:
         دّْ           d:
         دْ           d

.group ذ
         ذ           D
         ذ (_        D
         ذّ           D:
         ذّْ           D:
         ذْ           D

.group ر
         ر           r
         ر (_        r
         رّ           r:
         رّْ           r:
         رْ           r

.group ز
         ز           z
         ز (_        z
         زّ           z:
         زّْ           z:
         زْ           z

.group س
         س           s
      _) س           s%
         س (_        s
         سّ           s:
         سّْ           s:
         سْ           s

.group ش
         ش           S
         ش (_        S
         شّ           S:
         شّْ           S:
         شْ           S

.group ص
         ص           s[
         ص (_        s[
         صّ           s[:
         صّْ           s[:
         صْ           s[

.group ض
         ض           dH
         ض (_        dH
         ضّ           dH:
         ضّْ           dH:
         ضْ           dH

.group ط
         ط           t[
         ط (_        t[
         طّ           t[:
         طّْ           t[:
         طْ           t[

.group ظ
         ظ           Z
         ظ (_        Z
         ظّ           Z:
         ظّْ           Z:
         ظْ           Z

.group ع
         ع           A
         ع (_        A
         عّ           A:
         عّْ           A:
         عْ           A

.group غ
         غ           gH
         غ (_        gH
         غّ           gH:
         غّْ           gH:
         غْ           gH

.group ف
         ف           f
         ف (_        f
         فّ           f:
         فّْ           f:
         فْ           f
      _) ف           f%
      _) فال (L10P3  fa        //فالشمس
      _) فَال (L10P4  fa
      _) فَالْ (L10P4  fa
      _) فال (L11P3  fal       //فالقمر
      _) فَال (L11P4  fa
      _) فَالْ (L11P4  fal
      _) فال (تP3    fat
      _) فال (ثP3    faT
      _) فال (دP3    fad
      _) فال (ذP3    faD
      _) فال (رP3    far
      _) فال (زP3    faz
      _) فال (سP3    fas
      _) فال (شP3    faS
      _) فال (صP3    fas[
      _) فال (ضP3    fadH
      _) فال (طP3    fat[
      _) فال (ظP3    faZ
      _) فال (لP3    fal
      _) فال (نP3    fan

.group ق
         ق           q
         ق (_        q
         قّ           q:
         قّْ           q:
         قْ           q

.group ك
         ك           k
         ك   (_      k
         كّ           k:
         كّْ           k:
         كْ           k
         ك   (_S1    ka        // الضمير المتصل
      _) ك           k%
      _) كال (L10P3  ka        //كالشمس
      _) كَال (L10P4  ka
      _) كَالْ (L10P4  ka
      _) كال (L11P3  kal       //كالقمر
      _) كَالْ (L11P4  kal
      _) كال (تP3    kat
      _) كال (ثP3    kaT
      _) كال (دP3    kad
      _) كال (ذP3    kaD
      _) كال (رP3    kar
      _) كال (زP3    kaz
      _) كال (سP3    kas
      _) كال (شP3    kaS
      _) كال (صP3    kas[
      _) كال (ضP3    kadH
      _) كال (طP3    kat[
      _) كال (ظP3    kaZ
      _) كال (لP3    kal
      _) كال (نP3    kan
         كما (_S3    k'uma:     //الضمير المتصل
         كن  (_S2    k'un:a     //الضمير المتصل

.group گ
         گ           g
         گ (_        g
         گّ           g:
         گّْ           g:
         گْ           g

.group ل
         ل           l
      _) ل           l%
     _ا) ل (L10      '         // Sun letters
    _بِا) ل (L10      '         // Sun letters
    _فَا) ل (L10      '         // Sun letters
    _كَا) ل (L10      '         // Sun letters
         ل (_        l
         لّ           l:
         لّْ           l:
         لْ           l
     _لِ) ل (L10      '         // Sun letters
    _وَا) ل (L10      '         // Sun letters

.group م
         م           m
         م (_        m
         مّ           m:
         مّْ           m:
         مْ           m

.group ن
         ن           n
         ن (_        n
         نّ           n:
         نّْ           n:
         نْ           n
         ن (ب        m
         نْ (ب        m

.group ه
         ه           h
         ه (_        h
         هّ           h:
         هّْ           h:
         هْ           h
         ه (_S1      h         // الضمير المتصل
         ها (_S2     ha:       //الضمير المتصل
         هم (_S2     hum       //الضمير المتصل
         هما (_S3    h'uma:     //الضمير المتصل
         هن (_S2     h'un:a     //الضمير المتصل

.group و
         و           w
    L30) و           u:
      F) و           u.:
     FG) و           u.:
      ا) و           w         //واو بعد الألف
         و (A        w         //واو بعدها حرف علة
         و (_        w
         وّ           w:
         وّْ           w
         وْ           w
       ْ) و           w         // واو بعد سكون
       َ) و           w         //واو بعد فتحة
      _) و           w%
      _) و           w         //واو في أول الكلمة
         وء          ?         // Carried Hamza
         وا (_S2     u
         وا (_S2     u:        // فعل مع ضمائر الجمع المذكرة درسوا
      _) وال (L10P3  wa        //والشمس
      _) وَال (L10P4  wa
      _) وَالْ (L10P4  wa
      _) وال (L11P3  wal       //والقمر
      _) وَال (L11P4  wal
      _) وَالْ (L11P4  wal
      _) وال (تP3    wat
      _) وال (ثP3    waT
      _) وال (دP3    wad
      _) وال (ذP3    waD
      _) وال (رP3    war
      _) وال (زP3    waz
      _) وال (سP3    was
      _) وال (شP3    waS
      _) وال (صP3    was[
      _) وال (ضP3    wadH
      _) وال (طP3    wat[
      _) وال (ظP3    waZ
      _) وال (لP3    wal
      _) وال (نP3    wan
         ون (_S2     'u:na     //جمع مذكر سالم فلاحون
